Washington statutes.
RCW 35.21.175

Offices to be open certain days and hours.

All city and town offices shall be kept open for the transaction of business during such days and hours as the municipal legislative authority shall by ordinance prescribe.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.21.175. Prior: 1955 ex.s. c 9 s 4; prior: 1951 c 100 s 2.]